Arkansas, session 2025, SB542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 27, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
20-77-2709. Quality rating system.
(a) The risk-based provider organizations shall have a basic quality
rating system that is accessible online that includes ratings for each risk-
based provider organization based on data that includes at a minimum the
following measures that are currently collected by the risk-based provider
organization:
(1) The number of days before initial delivery of home- and
community-based services for individuals who have received a waiver slot in
*JMB586*
03/20/2025 3:07:50 PM JMB586

SB542
the Community and Employment Support Waiver;
(2) The care coordinator caseload ratios;
(3) The scores of a satisfaction survey of members of the risk-
based provider organization that includes at least the following:
(A) The satisfaction of individuals assessed with
intellectual and developmental disabilities with their level of integration
into the community;
(B) The satisfaction of individuals assessed with
intellectual and developmental disabilities who report satisfaction with
their living arrangements;
(C) The numbers and percentages of enrollees assessed with
intellectual and developmental disabilities who are engaged in meaningful,
competitive employment;
(D) The satisfaction with care coordinators by individuals
assessed with intellectual and developmental disabilities and by intellectual
and developmental disabilities service providers;
(E) The satisfaction with care coordinators by individuals
assessed with behavioral health needs and by behavioral health providers;
(F) The satisfaction with the website or portal of the
risk-based provider organizations by individuals assessed with intellectual
and developmental disabilities and by intellectual and developmental
disabilities service providers;
(G) The satisfaction with the website or portal of the
risk-based provider organizations by individuals assessed with behavioral
health needs and by behavioral health providers;
(H) The overall satisfaction with the risk-based provider
organization by individuals assessed with intellectual and developmental
disabilities and by intellectual and developmental disabilities service
providers; and
(I) The overall satisfaction with the risk-based provider
organization by individuals assessed with behavioral health needs and by
behavioral health providers;
(4) The percentage of individuals assessed with intellectual and
developmental disabilities who receive follow-up care after an emergency
department visit within seven (7) days;
(5) The percentage of individuals assessed with behavioral
03/20/2025 3:07:50 PM JMB586

SB542
health needs who receive follow-up care after an emergency department visit
within seven (7) days;
(6) The percentage of members between three (3) years age and
twenty-one (21) years of age who had at least one (1) comprehensive well-care
visit with a primary care provider or an obstetrician-gynecologist
practitioner during the measurement year;
(7) The percentage of newly enrolled members who receive an
initial contact with a care coordinator within fourteen (14) days;
(8) The percentage of enrolled members who receive monthly
contact with a care coordinator; and
(9) The incidence of enrollee complaints or grievances.
(b) The ratings shall be prominently displayed on the website of
Department of Human Services for risk-based provider organizations.

20-77-2710. Provider directories.
(a) Each risk-based provider organization shall provide to enrollees
real-time access to its provider network directory through a link on the
website of Department of Human Services and on the website of the risk-based
provider organization.
(b) The risk-based provider organizations shall ensure that the
provider directories are updated for the upcoming plan year so that enrollees
can make informed decisions.
(c) When an existing network provider’s status has or will change to
out-of-network, the risk-based provider organization shall make that change
in the provider directory within ten (10) business days of the change being
communicated to or from the risk-based provider organization.

20-77-2711. Beneficiary support office.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall have a dedicated
beneficiary support system that is adequately staffed and trained to meet the
requirements of 42 C.F.R. § 438.71, as existing on January 1, 2025.
(b) Enrollees and other members of the public shall be able to easily
contact the department for information about the risk-based provider
organization, including open enrollment, choice counseling, updated
information on provider networks, assistance in understanding how to use the
quality rating system to select a plan, and other pertinent information.
03/20/2025 3:07:50 PM JMB586

SB542
(c) The ombudsman shall also have the authority to help enrollees
informally resolve issues between enrollees and risk-based provider
organizations.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
The Department of Human Services may promulgate rules to implement this
act.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act shall be effective on January 1, 2026.


























03/20/2025 3:07:50 PM JMB586